Hawaii statutes.
§467B-12 Filing requirements for
professional fundraising counsel and professional solicitors. (a) Every
professional fundraising counsel or professional solicitor, prior to any
solicitation, shall register with the department. The registration statement
shall contain the information set forth in subsection (e). The registration
statement shall be accompanied by a fee in the amount of $250, or in the amount
and with any additional sums as may be prescribed by the attorney general.
Renewal registration statements shall be filed with the department on or before
July 1 of each calendar year by each professional fundraising counsel or
professional solicitor. The renewal statement shall contain the information
set forth in subsection (e). A renewal fee of $250, or in any amount and with
any additional sums as may be prescribed by the attorney general, shall
accompany the renewal statement. If a renewal registration required under this
section is not filed, unless it is shown that the failure is due to reasonable
cause, a fine of $20 shall be imposed for each day during which the violation
continues; provided that the total amount imposed under this subsection shall
not exceed $1,000.

(b) Each professional solicitor, at the time
of each filing, shall file with and have approved by the attorney general a
bond in which the applicant is the principal obligor in the penal sum of
$25,000 issued with good and sufficient surety or sureties approved by the
attorney general and which shall remain in effect for one year. The bond shall
inure to the benefit of the State, conditioned that the applicant, its
officers, directors, employees, agents, servants, and independent contractors
shall not violate this chapter. A partnership or corporation that is a
professional solicitor may file a consolidated bond on behalf of all its
members, officers, and employees.

(c) The attorney general shall examine each
registration statement and supporting document filed by a professional
fundraising counsel or professional solicitor and shall determine whether the
registration requirements are satisfied. If the attorney general determines
that the registration requirements are not satisfied, the attorney general
shall notify the professional fundraising counsel or professional solicitor in
writing within fifteen business days of its receipt of the registration
statement; otherwise the registration statement is deemed to be approved.
Within seven business days after receipt of a notification that the
registration requirements are not satisfied, the professional fundraising
counsel or professional solicitor may request a hearing.

(d) The attorney general may require that
registration and renewal registration, surety bonds, and contracts be filed
with the department electronically and may require the use of electronic
signatures.

(e) Each registration and renewal registration
shall contain:

(1) The names and addresses of all owners, officers,
and directors of a professional fundraising counsel, and the names and
addresses of all owners, officers, and directors of a professional solicitor;

(2) A statement concerning the corporate form of the
registrant, whether corporation, limited liability corporation, partnership, or
individual;

(3) A statement whether the registrant has an office
in Hawaii and the name and phone number of the person in charge of the office;

(4) The names and addresses of any individuals
supervising any solicitation activity;

(5) A statement whether the [registrant] has entered
into a consent agreement with, or been disciplined by or subject to
administrative action by, another governmental agency;

(6) A statement whether any officer, director, or any
person with a controlling interest in the registrant has ever been convicted of
a felony or a misdemeanor involving dishonesty in the solicitation for a
charitable purpose;

(7) The date that the registrant began soliciting
Hawaii residents on behalf of a charitable organization or providing
professional fundraising counsel services; and

(8) Whether any owners, directors, or officers are
related to:

(A) Any other officers, directors, owners, or
employees of the registrant;

(B) Any officer, director, trustee, or
employee of a charitable organization under contract with the registrant; and

(C) Any
vendor or supplier providing goods or services to a charitable organization
under contract with the registrant. [L 1969, c 167, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L
1993, c 206, §13; am L 2004, c 93, §12; am L 2006, c 168, §5; am L 2008, c 174,
§9; am L 2013, c 61, §12]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next